Wisconsin, session 2025, AB386.
do enact as follows:AB386,13Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 4insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB386,25Section 2. 20.115 (4) (aq) of the statutes is created to read:AB386,2,8620.115 (4) (aq) Agricultural purchase program. As a continuing 7appropriation, the amounts in the schedule for the agricultural purchase program 8under s. 93.62.AB386,39Section 3. 93.62 of the statutes is created to read:AB386,2,141093.62 Agricultural purchase program. The department shall create an 11agricultural purchase program under which the department may award grants 12from the appropriation under s. 20.115 (4) (aq) to any of the following entities that 13provide food assistance for the purpose of purchasing food products that are made 14or grown in this state:AB386,2,1615(a) Nonprofit food banks, nonprofit food pantries, and other nonprofit 16organizations.AB386,2,1717(b) Local food distributors.AB386,418Section 4. Nonstatutory provisions.AB386,3,219(1) Authorized FTE positions. The authorized FTE positions for the 20department of agriculture, trade and consumer protection are increased by 1.0 GPR 21position for a program specialist in the agricultural purchase program under s. 2293.62 and 1.0 GPR position for a grants specialist in the agricultural purchase 1program under s. 93.62, to be funded from the appropriation under s. 20.115 (4) 2(aq).AB386,53Section 5. Effective date.AB386,3,54(1) This act takes effect on the day after publication, or on the 2nd day after 5publication of the 2025 biennial budget act, whichever is later.AB386,3,66